Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-10,108
Public parks; conveyance to school districts; when authorized; resolution.

Any city or village in this state may convey title to any real estate owned by any such city or village dedicated or used as a public park to the school district in any such city or village within the boundaries of which such real estate lies, whenever in the judgment of the governing body of any such city or village such real estate is no longer necessary or desirable for use as a public park. The judgment of such governing body shall be evidenced by a resolution, which resolution shall not be finally passed earlier than the next succeeding regular meeting of such governing body after the regular meeting at which it was introduced.

Laws 1937, c. 36, § 1, p. 165;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 79-2901;

R.S.1943, § 79-2144;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 183, p. 751;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,145;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 754.